Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.037

Legislature—Security and protection—Duty to provide.

The chief of the Washington state patrol is directed to provide such security and protection for both houses of the legislative building while in session as in the opinion of the speaker of the house and the president of the senate may be necessary therefor upon the advice of the respective sergeant-at-arms of each legislative body.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 96 s 2.]